apertium-tki.tki.lexc
LEXICON N3 ! Nationalities which can form language, etc.
           ! e.g. turk, turkçe

%<n%>: SUBST ; 
!%<adj%>: ADJ-CLIT ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
!%<n%>%+laş:%>l%{A%}ş V-IR-IV ;

LEXICON N4
%<n%>: N-COMMON ;

LEXICON N5
%<n%>%<nom%>: # ;
!%<n%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
!%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r CLIT-GENERAL ;
!%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON NP-AL 

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: NP-COMMON ;



LEXICON NP-TOP-ACR

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: # ;
!%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>:%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
!%<np%>%<top%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;


!LEXICON RegNounInfl

!%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
!%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA
! 
! make Uyghur
%<cnjadv%>: # ;


LEXICON NUM 

%<num%>: # ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{i%}نج%{I%} V-COP ;               ! Beşinci evi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{i%}نج%{I%} SUBST ;      ! Beşinciyi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%' SUBST ;

!LEXICON N1
!%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON POST 

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;
	
LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG !determiner negative

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;


LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF !determiner reflexive

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV1

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>: V-COP ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>:%>ک%{I%} # ;


LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>: # ;
!%<adv%>: V-COP ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV3

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>: V-COP ;

LEXICON ADV4

%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>: V-COP ;
!%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>:%>ک%{I%} # ;
LEXICON PRON-ADV 

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE-NONOM ;

LEXICON A1

!%<adj%>: N-COMMON ;
%<adj%>: V-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: N-COMMON ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: N-COMMON ;
%<adj%>: V-COP ;
%<adj%>:SUBST ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: N-COMMON ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>: V-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: N-COMMON ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: N-COMMON ;



LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL !inflectional suffix
%<prn%>%<itg%>: N-COMMON ; 

LEXICON PRON-QNT
%<prn%>%<qnt%>: N-COMMON ;
%<prn%>%<qnt%>%<pl%>:%>لار # ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG
%<adv%>%<itg%>: V-COP ; 
%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;!SUBST ;

LEXICON V-FUT-PERS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>م # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>سەن # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>غ # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>سز # ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>لار # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;
LEXICON V-PAST-PERS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>م # ;!CLITICS ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>سەن # ;!CLITICS ; 
!%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>سز CLITICS ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;  ! CLITICS ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>یغ # ; ! CLITICS ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>سز # ; ! CLITICS ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:لار # ; ! CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-IFI-PERS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:م # ;!CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:ن # ;!CLITICS ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:ی # ; !CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ; !CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:یغ # ; ! CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:نیز # ; ! CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:لار # ; ! CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PROG-PERS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:م # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:سان # ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:ی # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:غ # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:سز # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:لار # ;

LEXICON V-AOR-PERS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:م # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:سان # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:غ # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:سز # ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:ل%{A%}ر # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:لار # ;


LEXICON V-AOR

%<aor%>:%>%{a%}ر V-COP ; 
!%<aor%>:%>ر V-COP ; 
!%<aor3%>:%>%{U%}%{r%} V-COP ;
!%<aor%>:%>%{A%}%{r%} V-COP ;
!%<aor%>:%>%{A%} V-COP ;
!%<aor%>:%>%{U%}ل V-COP ;
!%<aor%>:%>%{A%}ل V-COP ;
!%<aor%>:%>ر V-COP ;
!%<aor%>: V-COP ;
!%<aor%>:%>ا V-COP ;
!%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>م%{A%} V-COP-PERS ; 
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>م%{A%}ز V-COP-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-PROG
%<prog%>:%>%{y%}ر V-PROG-PERS ;
%<prog%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}ر V-COP ;
!%<prog%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} V-PROG-PERS ;
!%<prog%>:%>%{y%}%{U%} V-PROG-PERS ;
%<neg%>%<prog%>:%>م%{A%}%{y%}%{I%}ر V-COP-PERS ;

LEXICON V-IFI

%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-IFI-PERS ; 
!%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{U%} V-IFI-PERS ;
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>م%{A%}%{D%}%{I%} V-COP-PERS ;

LEXICON V-PAST

%<past%>:%>م%{I%}ش V-PAST-PERS ;
%<past%>:%>م%{U%}ش V-PAST-PERS ;
%<past%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}ب V-PAST-PERS ;
%<past%>:%>%{y%}%{U%}ب V-PAST-PERS ;
%<past%>:%>%{I%}پ V-PAST-PERS ;
%<past%>:%>م%{A%}م%{I%}ش V-PAST-PERS ;

LEXICON V-FUT
!%<fut%>:%>%{A%}ج%{A%}غ V-FUT-PERS ;
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}ر V-FUT-PERS ;
!%<fut%>%<fut%>:%>م%{A%}ی%{A%}ج%{A%}غ V-FUT-PERS ;
%<fut%>%<neg%>:%>م%{A%}ز V-FUT-PERS ;
!%<fut%>%<dub%>:%>%{E%}%>دی%{G%}%{A%}ن V-COP-PERS ;

LEXICON V-ABIL-PERS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:م # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:سون # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:سن # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:غن # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:غ # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:سز # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:ن%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:لار # ;




LEXICON V-TENSE-ABIL
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} V-ABIL-PERS ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{U%} V-ABIL-PERS ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} V-ABIL-PERS ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}بیل V-AOR ;
%<abil%>:%>س%{A%}ن V-ABIL-PERS ;      
%<abil%>:%>س%{U%}ن V-ABIL-PERS ;
%<abil%>:%>%{A%} V-ABIL-PERS ;
%<abil%>:%> V-ABIL-PERS ;
%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}بیلم V-ABIL-PERS ;
%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}م V-PROG ;
%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}م%{A%} V-IFI ;




LEXICON IMP-PERS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}م # ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{U%}م # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:گ%{I%}ن%{A%}ن # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:گ%{U%}ن%{A%}ن # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>س%{I%}ن # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>س%{U%}ن # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>ی%{A%}غ # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>ی%{A%}غن # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ی%{I%}ن # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{U%}ن # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>س{I%}نل%{A%}ر # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>س{I%}نن%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>س{U%}نل%{A%}ر # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>س{U%}نن%{A%} # ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

CASE ;
!GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;
LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}م GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ن GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}م%{I%}ز GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ن%{I%}ز GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3pl%>:%>لار%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-N-INFL-COMMON

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-SUBST

GER-N-INFL-COMMON ; 
!%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r GER-N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-GER
%<gpr_rsub%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}ن SUBST ; ! 
%<gpr_rsub%>:%>%{y%}%{a%}ن SUBST ; ! 
%<gpr_rsub%>:%>ن%{A%}ن SUBST ; !
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}ن SUBST ; !
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}ج%{A%}غ%{v%} GER-SUBST ;
%<gpr_past%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}غ SUBST ; !
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}غ SUBST ; !
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}ه SUBST ; !
%<gpr_when%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}نج%{A%} SUBST ; !nead to be tested
%<gna_when%>:%>%{I%}نج%{A%} SUBST ; !nead to be tested
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}%{P%} SUBST ; !nead to be tested
%<gna_aor%>:%>کن SUBST ; !nead to be tested Ex:geçerken
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}ر%{A%}ك # ;
%<gna_neg%>:%>م%{A%}د%{A%}ن SUBST ; !nead to be tested Ex:olmadan
%<ger_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}غ NP-COMMON ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}ن GER-SUBST ;
%<ger%>:%>م%{A%} GER-SUBST ;

LEXICON V-GERUNDS-AOR-AR

%<ger_aor%>:%>%{A%}ر GER-N-INFL-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-IMP
%<imp%>: IMP-PERS ;
!%<imp%>%<neg%>:م%{A%} IMP-PERS ;

LEXICON V-COND-PERS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>م CLITICS ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ی CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>غ CLITICS ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ین CLITICS ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>یز CLITICS ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>ل%{A%}ر CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-COND 
%<gna_cond%>:%>س%{A%} V-COND-PERS ;
%<cond%>:%>س%{A%} V-COND-PERS ;

LEXICON V-NEG
%<neg%>:م%{A%} V-NEG-COMMON ;


LEXICON V-DERIV
V-COMMON ;
!V-NEG-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-PRC

%<prc%>:%>مغ # ;
%<neg%>%<prc%>:%>م%{A%}%>مغ # ;

LEXICON V-GERUNDS
%<ger_inf%>:%>مغ GER-SUBST ; 


LEXICON V-NEG-COMMON
V-AOR ;
V-PROG ;
V-IFI ;
V-PAST ;
V-GER ;
V-FUT ;
V-TENSE-ABIL ;	
V-IMP ;
V-COND ;
V-PRC ;


LEXICON V-COMMON
V-NEG ;
V-AOR ;
V-PROG ;
V-IFI ;
V-GER ;
V-GERUNDS-AOR-AR ;
V-PAST ;
V-FUT ;
V-TENSE-ABIL ;	
V-IMP ;
V-COND ;
V-PRC ;
V-GERUNDS ;

LEXICON Adjectives
إیمانلی:إیمانلی A1 ;
بسلمه:بسلمه A1 ;
عاقلسز:عاقلسز A1 ;
فاردلیر:فارقدلیر A2 ;
علاوه:علاوه A1 ;
جنوب% امریکا:جنوب% امریکا A4 ;
مادی:مادی A2 ;
سوپهلی:شوپهلی A2 ;
داغلغ:داغلغ A3 ;
کحوایی:کحوایی A2 ;
سجاق% قانلی:سجاق% قانلی A1 ;
قارشلغلی:قارشلغلی A4 ;
هیجری:هیجری A4 ;
دیشی:دیشی A2 ;
یوخسول:یوخسول A1 ;
إستراتیجی:إستراتیجی A4 ;
بینلرجه:بینلرجه A1 ;
اوزو:اوزو A4 ;
گرکن:گرکن A4 ;
أیدیولوجی:أیدولوجی A4 ;
دستوری:دستوری A4 ;
دولی:دولی A2 ;
تنضیملی:تنضیملی A1 ;
مونزم:مونزم A2 ;
ساری:ساری A2 ;
عسکری:عسکری A3 ;
دوز:دوز A1 ;
پیسکولجیك:پیسکولجیك A4 ;
ممتاز:ممتاز A2 ;
LEXICON Adverbs
نیجا:نیجا ADV-ITG ;
نیجی:نیجی ADV-ITG ;
شبهسیز:شبهسیز ADV2 ;
هاردان:هاردان ADV3 ;
هاردا:هاردا ADV-ITG ;
نیه:نیه ADV-ITG ;
نچی:نچی ADV-ITG ;
هارا:هارا ADV-ITG ;
نيجه:نيجه ADV-ITG ;
یلارجه:ییلارجه ADV1 ; !
بوگون:بوگون ADV4 ;
یاوش% یاوش:یاوش% یاوش ADV3 ;
عجله:عجله ADV2 ;
اشاغی:اشاغی ADV2 ;
رئیسی:رئیسی ADV2 ;
یارن:یارن ADV1 ;
نیچین:نیچین ADV1 ;
أوردا:أوردا ADV1 ;
هر% یل:هر% یل ADV1 ;
بیلفعل:بیلفعل ADV2 ;
گچ:گچ ADV2 ;
قسمن:قسمن ADV2 ;
بدات:بدات ADV2 ;
أول:أول ADV4 ; 
سورا:سورا ADV4 ;
ینگدن:ینگدن ADV3 ;
ایلا:ایلا ADV1 ;
نیسبتن:نیسبتن ADV3 ;
اخشام:اخشام ADV3 ;
دونن:دونن ADV3 ;
هم:هم ADV3 ;
معلاسف:معلاسف ADV3 ;
هر% میلات:هر% میلات ADV1 ;
فازلا:فازلا ADV1 ;
دوغرسو:دوغرسو ADV3 ;
اولملو:اولملو ADV1 ;
LEXICON Determiners
بو:بو DET-DEM ;
او:او DET-DEM ;
أيشته% بو:أيشته% بو DET-DEM ;
أيشته:أيشته DET-DEM ;
إیشبو:إیشبو DET-DEM ;
هیچبیر:هیچبیر DET-QNT ;
هیچبیر:هیچبیر DET-NEG ;
هپ:هپ DET-QNT ;
قاچ:قاچ DET-QNT ;
بیر:بیر DET-IND ;
اوبر:اوبر DET-IND ;
بیرنچه:بیرنچه DET-IND ;
بیرقاچ:بیرقاچ DET-IND ;
باشقا:باشقا DET-IND ;
هرناخسی:هرناخسی DET-IND ;
بیرقاچ:بیرقاچ DET-IND ;
بله:بله DET-IND ;
بیراز:بیراز DET-QNT ;
ناخسی:ناخسی DET-ITG ;
هیچ% بیر:هیچ% بیر DET-NEG ;
بیر% تاخم:بیر% تاخم DET-QNT ;
بعزی:بعزی DET-QNT ;
او% قدر:او% قدر DET-QNT ;
توم:توم DET-QNT ;
او% بیر:او% بیر DET-DEM ;
ناخسی:ناخسی DET-ITG ;
هاسی:هاسی DET-ITG ; !which
ناخسی% بیری:ناخسی% بیری DET-IND ;
اوزو:اوزو DET-REF ;
بیرتاخم:بیرتاخم DET-QNT ;
هر:هر DET-DEM ; ! each
أوتكی:أوتكی DET-DEM ;
LEXICON Postpositions 
یولیلا:یولیلا POST ;
أرتسی:أرتسی POST ;
بوینجه:بوینجه POST ; ! "along, througout"
گرغین:گرغین POST ;
أونجه:أونجه POST ;
دولو:دولو POST ;
خاص:خاص POST ;
ضد:ضد POST ;
إیچین:إیچین POST ;
LEXICON Conjunctions 
بیله:بیله CA ;
یوخسا:یوخسا CA ;
إیلا:إیلا CC ;
یاهوت:یاهوت CC ;
یادا:یادا CC ; ! or
بەلكی:بەلكی CC ; ! 
دا:دا CC ;
زاید:زاید CC ; ! Plus
إیكیسی:إیكیسی CC ;
عكسینه:عكسینه CC ;
دیه:دیه CS ;
اولارغ:اولارغ CS ;
بلكی:بلكی CA ;
دمغ:دمغ CA ;
إیستر:إیستر CA ;
كی:كی CA ;
كی:كی CS ;
یوخ:یوخ CA ;
اولسن:اولسن CA ;
دیه:دیه CS ;
مسل:مسل CA ;
إیسه:إیسه CC ;
LEXICON Nouns
مایس:مایس N5 ;
أب:أب N5 ;
تموز:تموز N5 ;
قاسم:قاسم N5 ;
اوست:اوست N4 ;
أوزر:أوزر N4 ;
أوگ:أوگ N4 ;
تاراف:تاراف N4 ;
ارا:ارا N4 ;
ترك:ترك N3 ;
أرمنی:أرمنی N3 ;
چیله:چیله N5 ;
سورا:سورا N4 ;
خان:خان N3 ;
فرانسز:فرانسز N3 ;
تویتر:تویتر NP-AL ;
ارگینیون:ارگینیون NP-ORG ;
AKP:AKP NP-ORG ;
TCK:TCK NP-ORG ;
TSK:TSK NP-AL ;
TV:TV NP-AL ;
ماتلاب:ماتلاب NP-AL ;	
Perl:Perl NP-AL ;
www:www NP-AL ;
ABD:ABD%{ь%} NP-TOP-ACR ;
AB:AB NP-TOP-ACR ;
گوگول:گوگول NP-AL ;
اد:اد NP-AL ;
PKK:PKK NP-ORG ;
CEE:CEE NP-AL ;
LEXICON ProperNouns 
پویرازز:پویرازز NP-COG-MF ;
شفق:شفق NP-COG-MF ;
یلدرم:یلدرم NP-COG-MF ;
بلنت:بلنت NP-COG-MF ;
أوزتورك:أوزتورك NP-COG-MF ;
اوجلان:اوجلان NP-COG-MF ;
سلجوق:سلجوق NP-COG-MF ;
دمیرتاش:دمیرتاش NP-COG-MF ;
طلعت:طلعت NP-COG-MF ;
أرهان:أرهان NP-ANT-M ;
لطفی:لطفی NP-ANT-M ;
فکرت:فکرت NP-ANT-M ;
أوغوز:أوغوز NP-ANT-M ;
زکریا:زکریا NP-ANT-M ;
تورهان:تورهان NP-COG-MF ;
دورسون:دورسون NP-ANT-F ;
دجله:دجله NP-TOP ;
أنبار:أنبار NP-TOP ;
قونیا:قونیا NP-TOP ;
قارا% دینز:قارا% دنیز NP-TOP ;
بالکنلار:بالکنلار NP-TOP ;
موسکو:موسکو NP-TOP ;
تایلند:تایلند NP-TOP ;
بلاروس:بلاروس NP-TOP ;
قوجاإلی:قوجاألی NP-TOP ;
رویال:رویال NP-ORG ;
لینوکس:لینوکس NP-ORG ;
امازون:امازون NP-ORG ;
ویکیپیدیا:ویکیپیدیا NP-ORG ;
TBMM:TBMM NP-ORG ; !
تاییب:تاییب NP-ANT-M ;
مریم:مریم NP-ANT-F ;
عایشه:عایشه NP-ANT-F ;
ریهاننه:ریهاننه NP-ANT-F ;
المیرا:المیرا NP-ANT-F ;
ای% گول:ای% گول NP-ANT-F ;
ملیکه:ملیکه NP-ANT-F ;
ایجان:ایجان NP-ANT-F ;
بهار:بهار NP-ANT-F ;
محمد:محمد NP-ANT-M ;
روستم:روستم NP-ANT-M ;
قهرمان:قهرمان NP-ANT-M ;
